Nevada, session 83, SB132.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Nevada Clean Energy Fund formed pursuant to
NRS 701B.985 the sum of $500,000 for securing and implementing
grants for qualified clean energy projects in this State, including,
without limitation, costs associated with:
(a) Providing bridge or gap funding for qualified clean energy
projects;
(b) Providing technical support to state and local agencies; and
(c) Staffing and administering the Nevada Clean Energy Fund.
2. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
the Nevada Clean Energy Fund agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Nevada
Clean Energy Fund through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Nevada
Clean Energy Fund through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make available
to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts, claims,
reports, vouchers or other records of information, confidential or
otherwise, of the Nevada Clean Energy Fund, regardless of their
form or location, that the Legislative Auditor deems necessary
to conduct an audit of the use of the money appropriated by
subsection 1.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
4. As used in this section, “qualified clean energy project” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 701B.965.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)